Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-476
Aquaculture facilities; violations; general penalties.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, any person violating any of the provisions of sections 37-465 to 37-475 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VII, § 12, p. 441;

C.S.1929, § 37-712;

R.S.1943, § 37-712;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 203;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-712;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 186;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 55.